New York, session 2025-2026, A201.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision a of section 16-324 of the administrative code 2 of the city of New York is amended by adding a new paragraph 7 to read 3 as follows: 4 7. Notices of violation shall be in the form of a ticket and shall 5 include a photograph, taken by a member of the department of sanitation, 6 of the alleged violation. The photograph shall be stamped with the date, 7 time and place of the alleged violation and shall be mailed, with the 8 ticket, to the alleged violator. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00814-01-5